Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3967
Activities regulated.

The Nebraska Milk Act shall be used for the regulation of: (1) The production, transportation, processing, handling, sampling, examination, grading, labeling, and sale of all milk and milk products; (2) the inspection of dairy herds, dairy farms, milk plants, plants fabricating single-service articles, transfer stations, receiving stations, milk haulers, and milk distributors; and (3) the issuance, suspension, and revocation of permits.

Laws 1980, LB 632, § 2;

Laws 1986, LB 900, § 2;

Laws 1990, LB 856, § 3;

Laws 1997, LB 201, § 2;

Laws 2001, LB 198, § 2;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 2-3902;

Laws 2007, LB111, § 3.